Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1605.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; MINNESOTA HUMANITIES CENTER.new text end new text begin $2,500,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $2,500,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the arts and cultural heritage fund to the board of directors of the Minnesota Humanities Center for statewide humanities programs and to support and expand outreach, partnerships, and humanities programming with organizations and individuals throughout the state, including programming related to the culture of Minnesota, veterans and the military experience, professional development opportunities for educators, and programming representing and reflecting Black, Indigenous, and people of color. new text end